Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,117
Hospital authority; taxation exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by the provisions of sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state, for the increase of their commerce, welfare and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and as the operation and maintenance of a hospital by an authority or its agents will constitute the performance of an essential public function, neither the authority nor its agents shall be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon or in respect of a hospital or any property acquired or used by the authority or its agents under the provisions of sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 or upon the income therefrom, and any bonds issued under the provisions of sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by the municipalities and other political subdivisions in the state.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 44;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.117.